Washington statutes.
RCW 39.44.102

Facsimile signatures on bonds and coupons—Statements and signatures required on registered bonds.

Where any bond so issued requires registration by the county treasurer, that bond shall bear a statement on the back thereof showing the name of the person to whom sold, date of issue, the number and series of the bond, and shall be signed by the county treasurer in his or her own name or by a deputy county treasurer in his or her own name.

[ 2011 c 336 s 807; 1955 c 375 s 3.]